Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 3287.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary shall appoint one otolaryngologist, one audiologist, one hearing aid dispenser who is neither an otolaryngologist nor an audiologist, and one member of the public to serve as advisors in matters related to audiologists and hearing aid dispensers.

The public member shall be an individual with significant hearing impairment who uses a hearing aid regularly.

The members shall be appointed as set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129b

and shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisors appointed under this section in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Such members shall be entitled to compensation and necessary expenses in the amount provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

for attendance at any meeting called by the Director for this purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 83;

2007, No. 29

, § 46;

2011, No. 66

, § 10a, eff. June 1, 2011;

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3288.
Director duties.

The Director shall:

provide information to applicants for licensure as an audiologist or hearing aid dispenser;

administer fees collected under this chapter;

explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public;

receive applications for licensure, grant licensure under this chapter and renew licenses, and deny, revoke, suspend, reinstate, or condition licenses as directed by an administrative law officer;

refer all complaints and disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer established under

3 V.S.A. § 129(j)

; and

with the advice of the advisor appointees, adopt or amend rules necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4(b), (d), 84;

1997, No. 40

, § 49(a);

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.